Utah statutes.
63G-6-417.   Period of time for contract of supplies.

(1)  Unless otherwise provided by law, a contract for supplies or services may be entered into for any period of time considered to be in the best interests of the state; provided that the term of the contract and conditions of renewal or extension, if any, are included in the solicitation and funds are available for the first fiscal period at the time of contracting.  Payment and performance obligations for succeeding fiscal periods shall be subject to the availability and appropriation of funds.

(2)  Prior to the utilization of a multiyear contract, it shall be determined in writing that estimated requirements cover the period of the contract and are reasonably firm and continuing and that such a contract will serve the best interests of the state by encouraging effective competition or otherwise promoting economies in state procurement.

(3)  When funds are not appropriated or otherwise made available to support continuation of performance in a subsequent fiscal period, the contract shall be cancelled and the contractor shall be reimbursed for the reasonable value of any nonrecurring costs incurred but not amortized in the price of the supplies or services delivered under the contract.  The cost of cancellation may be paid from any appropriations available for that purpose.

